Utah statutes.
78B-6-125.   Time period prior to birth mother's consent.

(1)  A birth mother may not consent to the adoption of her child or relinquish control or custody of her child until at least 24 hours after the birth of her child.

(2)  The consent or relinquishment of any other person as required by Sections 78B-6-120 and 78B-6-121 may be executed at any time, including prior to the birth of the child.

